Hawaii statutes.
[§571-46.4] Child custody
evaluators; qualification; registry; complaints. (a) A person may be
appointed as a child custody evaluator for purposes of section 571-46 if the
person is actively licensed as a:

(1) Physician under chapter 453 and is a
board certified psychiatrist or has completed a residency in psychiatry;

(2) Psychologist under chapter 465;

(3) Marriage and family therapist under
chapter 451J; or

(4) Clinical social worker under section
467E-7(3).

(b) A person may be appointed as a child
custody evaluator in the absence of a license under subsection (a) if:

(1) The individual has obtained education and training that
meet nationally recognized competencies and standards of practice in child
custody evaluation; provided that there are no child custody evaluators
enumerated under subsection (a) who are willing and available, within a
reasonable period of time, to perform child custody evaluations; or

(2) The parties stipulate to a person
who does not qualify as a child custody evaluator under subsection (a) and the
court approves that person as a fact-finding investigator to the court.

(c) The judiciary shall maintain on its
website a publicly accessible registry of child custody evaluators who are
qualified pursuant to this section. Professionals who are willing and
available to perform child custody evaluations shall be responsible for
providing the judiciary with relevant information, including contact
information, evidence of qualifications, and fees.

(d) The judiciary shall establish a referral
process to allow parties to file a complaint with the judiciary regarding a
court-appointed child custody evaluator. Upon notification by a party of the
party's intent to file a complaint against a child custody evaluator appointed
under subsection (a), the judiciary may refer the complainant to the
appropriate licensing authority. The judiciary shall submit to the legislature
an annual report regarding the number of complaints against court-appointed
child custody evaluators that are processed through the referral process.

(e) A complaint against a court-appointed
child custody evaluator not qualified under subsection (a) may be resolved
through civil litigation. [L 2013, c 103, §2]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next